Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.62.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the Board of Marine Pilots;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“pilot” means a person licensed under this chapter as a pilot or a deputy pilot;

“vessel” means all vessels not exempt under AS

08.62.180

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 48 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 26 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Formerly
AS

08.62.200

. Renumbered in 1991. The paragraphs in this section were reorganized in 1991 and 2019 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, repealed former (4), which defined “knowingly”.

Sec. 08.62.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Marine Pilotage Act.

History.

(§ 27 ch 89 SLA 1991)